Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3803
Program for management of black-tailed prairie dogs; county; finding required; powers; discontinuance of program; collection of unpaid assessments.

(1) A county may adopt by resolution and carry out a coordinated program for the management of black-tailed prairie dogs on property within the county consistent with the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act. When a county adopts such a resolution, the county shall assume the authority and duties provided in the act and the act shall be applicable to persons owning or controlling property within the county.

(2) A black-tailed prairie dog management plan adopted pursuant to this section shall:

(a) Include a finding by the county board of adverse impacts of unmanaged colonies within the county and the necessity to exercise the authority made available under the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act;

(b) Include a listing of the methods for management of colonies to be used for purposes which are consistent with the act;

(c) Provide a method for an adjacent landowner to make a written waiver of objection to the expansion of a colony upon such adjacent landowner's property pursuant to section 23-3804; and

(d) Not conflict with any state management plan for black-tailed prairie dogs or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act or with any state or federal recovery plan for endangered or threatened species.

(3) A county may cooperate and coordinate with the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, the Game and Parks Commission, the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, and other local, state, and national agencies and organizations, public or private, to prepare a coordinated program for the control and management of black-tailed prairie dogs and to carry out its duties and responsibilities under the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act.

(4) A county may by resolution discontinue a coordinated program for the management of black-tailed prairie dogs. If such a program is discontinued, any unpaid assessments against landowners for costs of black-tailed prairie dog management shall continue to be collected pursuant to the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB805, § 8.

Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act, see section 37-801.